North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Department and Board of Transportation.
§ 136-27.3A.
Relocation of automatic license plate reader systems.

An authorized entity may relocate system equipment placed on right-of-way owned or maintained by the Department of Transportation in the event the authorized entity needs immediate access to the right-of-way or utility facilities. The authorized entity must promptly provide notice to the law enforcement agency that owns or controls the system equipment relocated pursuant to this section. An authorized entity shall only be liable for damages to system equipment caused solely by the authorized entity’s gross negligence or willful misconduct. For purposes of this section, the term “authorized entity” means the Department of Transportation or a public utility and the term “system equipment” means an automatic license plate reader system and related equipment.

History.

2021-180, s. 41.57(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.8, made this section, as added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 41.57(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021’.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 41.15(b), effective July 1, 2021, substituted “and State Maintenance” for “State Maintenance, and Ferry Operations,”.

§ 136-27.4.
Use of certain right-of-way for sidewalk dining.

The Department may enter into an agreement with any local government permitting use of the State right-of-way associated with components of the State highway system and located within the zoning jurisdiction of the local government for sidewalk dining activities. For purposes of this section, “sidewalk dining activities” means serving food and beverages from a restaurant abutting State right-of-way to customers seated in the State right-of-way. The agreement between the Department and the local government shall provide that the local government is granted the administrative right to permit sidewalk dining activities that, at a minimum, comply with all of the following requirements and conditions:

Tables, chairs, and other furnishings shall be placed a minimum of six feet from any travel lane.

Tables, chairs, and other furnishings shall be placed in such a manner that at least five feet of unobstructed paved space of the sidewalk, measured from any permanent or semi-permanent object, remains clear for the passage of pedestrians and provides adequate passing space that complies with the Americans with Disabilities Act.

Tables, chairs, and other furnishings shall not obstruct any driveway, alleyway, building entrance or exit, emergency entrance or exit, fire hydrant or standpipe, utility access, ventilations areas, or ramps necessary to meet accessibility requirements under the Americans with Disabilities Act.

The maximum posted speed permitted on the roadway adjacent to the right-of-way to be used for sidewalk dining activities shall not be greater than 45 miles per hour.

The restaurant operator shall provide evidence of adequate liability insurance in an amount satisfactory to the local government, but in no event in an amount less than the amount specified by the local government under

G.S. 160A-485

as the limit of the local government’s waiver of immunity or the amount of Tort Claim liability specified in

G.S. 143-299.2

, whichever is greater. The insurance shall protect and name the Department and the local government as additional insureds on any policies covering the business and the sidewalk activities.

The restaurant operator shall provide an agreement to indemnify and hold harmless the Department or the local government from any claim resulting from the operation of sidewalk dining activities.

The restaurant operator shall provide a copy of all permits and licenses issued by the State, county or city, including health and ABC permits, if any, necessary for the operation of the restaurant or business, or a copy of the application for the permit if no permit has been issued. This requirement includes any permits or certificates issued by the county or city for exterior alterations or improvements to the restaurant.

The restaurant operator shall cease part or all sidewalk dining activities in order to allow construction, maintenance, or repair of any street, sidewalk, utility, or public building, by the Department, the local government, its agents or employees, or by any other governmental entity or public utility.

Any other requirements deemed necessary by the Department, either for a particular local government or a particular component of the State highway system.A local government given the administrative right to permit sidewalk dining activities under this section may impose additional requirements on a case-by-case basis, and nothing in this section requires the local government to issue or maintain any permit for sidewalk dining activities if, in the opinion of the local government, such activities cannot be conducted in a safe manner. Nothing in this section requires the Department to give a local government the right to establish a permit program for sidewalk dining activities if, in the opinion of the Department, such activities cannot be conducted in a safe manner.

A municipality applying to the Department for administrative rights under this section shall:

Enact an ordinance consistent with, but not necessarily limited to, the requirements of this section.

For applications along a federal-aid route or where the laws of the United States otherwise require, obtain permission from the Federal Highway Administration to permit the right-of-way to be used for the sidewalk dining.

History.

2013-266, s. 2.

§ 136-28.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 972, s. 6.

§ 136-28.1.
Letting of contracts to bidders after advertisement; exceptions.

All contracts over five million dollars ($5,000,000) that the Department of Transportation may let for construction, maintenance, operations, or repair necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter, shall be let to a responsible bidder after public advertising under rules and regulations to be made and published by the Department of Transportation. The right to reject any and all bids shall be reserved to the Board of Transportation. Contracts for construction or repair for federal aid projects entered into pursuant to this section shall not contain the standardized contract clauses prescribed by 23 U.S.C. § 112(e) and 23 C.F.R. § 635.109 for differing site conditions, suspensions of work ordered by the engineer or significant changes in the character of the work. For those federal aid projects, the Department of Transportation shall use only the contract provisions for differing site conditions, suspensions of work ordered by the engineer, or significant changes in the character of the work developed by the North Carolina Department of Transportation and approved by the Board of Transportation.

For contracts let to carry out the provisions of this Chapter in which the amount of work to be let to contract for transportation infrastructure construction or repair is five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, and for transportation infrastructure maintenance, excluding resurfacing, that is five million dollars ($5,000,000) per year or less, at least three informal bids shall be solicited. The term “informal bids” is defined as bids in writing, received pursuant to a written request, without public advertising. All such contracts shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. Where public advertising is used for a contract subject to this subsection, the Highway Division shall post the advertisement at least 14 calendar days prior to the letting date of the contract. The Secretary of Transportation shall keep a record of all bids submitted, which record shall be subject to public inspection at any time after the bids are opened. The Highway Divisions shall publish the results of a bidding process no later than three business days after the contract bid upon is awarded.

(b1)

Notwithstanding any provision of

G.S. 136-28.5

to the contrary, and except as prohibited by other State or federal law, the Department of Transportation shall, at the time and place bids solicited for a contract subject to this section are opened, make public all cost estimates prepared by the Department for the purpose of comparing the bids.

The construction, maintenance, and repair of ferryboats and all other marine floating equipment and the construction and repair of all types of docks by the Department of Transportation shall be deemed highway construction, maintenance, or repair for the purpose of

G.S. 136-28.1

and Chapter 44A and Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, the State Budget Act. In cases of a written determination by the Secretary of Transportation that the requirement for compatibility does not make public advertising feasible for the repair of ferryboats, the public advertising as well as the soliciting of informal bids may be waived.

The construction, maintenance, and repair of the highway rest area buildings and facilities, weight stations and the Department of Transportation’s participation in the construction of welcome center buildings shall be deemed highway construction, maintenance, or repair for the purpose of

G.S. 136-28.1

and 136-28.3 and Chapter 143C of the General Statutes, the State Budget Act.

The Department of Transportation may enter into contracts for construction, maintenance, or repair without complying with the bidding requirements of this section upon a determination of the Secretary of Transportation or the Secretary’s designee that an emergency exists and that it is not feasible or not in the public interest for the Department of Transportation to comply with the bidding requirements. For purposes of this section, the term “emergency” includes any of the following that is unanticipated, results in detours or deters the free movement of goods and services, and requires an estimated expenditure of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) or less in construction, maintenance, or repair costs:

A bridge closure.

A road closure.

A weight restriction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Transportation may solicit proposals under rules and regulations adopted by the Department of Transportation for all contracts for professional engineering services and other kinds of professional or specialized services necessary in connection with the planning, operations, design, maintenance, repair, and construction of transportation infrastructure. In order to promote engineering and design quality and ensure maximum competition by professional firms of all sizes, the Department may establish fiscal guidelines and limitations necessary to promote cost-efficiencies in overhead, salary, and expense reimbursement rates. The right to reject any and all proposals is reserved to the Board of Transportation.

The Department of Transportation may enter into contracts for research and development with educational institutions and nonprofit organizations without soliciting bids or proposals.

The Department of Transportation may enter into contracts for applied research and experimental work without soliciting bids or proposals; provided, however, that if the research or work is for the purpose of testing equipment, materials, or supplies, the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes shall apply. However, the Department of Transportation shall: (i) submit all proposed contracts for supplies, materials, printing, equipment, and contractual services that exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) authorized by this subsection to the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee for review as provided in

G.S. 114-8.3

; and (ii) include in all proposed contracts to be awarded by the Department of Transportation under this subsection a standard clause which provides that the State Auditor and internal auditors of the Department of Transportation may audit the records of the contractor during and after the term of the contract to verify accounts and data affecting fees and performance. The Department of Transportation shall not award a cost plus percentage of cost agreement or contract for any purpose. The Department of Transportation is encouraged to solicit proposals when contracts are entered into with private firms when it is in the public interest to do so.

The Department of Transportation may negotiate and enter into contracts with public utility companies for the lease, purchase, installation, and maintenance of generators for electricity for its ferry repair facilities.

Repealed by Session Laws 2002-151, s. 1, effective October 9, 2002.

The Department of Transportation may accept bids under this section by electronic means and may issue rules governing the acceptance of these bids. For purposes of this subsection “electronic means” is defined as means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

The Department of Transportation may enter into contracts for public-private participation in providing litter removal from State right-of-way. Selection of firms to perform this work shall be made using a best value procurement process and shall be without regard to other provisions of law regarding the Adopt-A-Highway Program administered by the Department. Acknowledgement of sponsors may be indicated by appropriate signs that shall be owned by the Department of Transportation. The size, style, specifications, and content of the signs shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Department of Transportation. The Department of Transportation may issue guidelines, rules, and policies necessary to administer this subsection.

The Department of Transportation may enter into contracts for public-private participation at State-owned rest areas. Selection of firms shall be made using a best value procurement process. Recognition of sponsors in the program may be indicated by appropriate acknowledgment for any services provided. The size, style, specifications, and content of the acknowledgment shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Department. Revenues generated pursuant to a contract initiated under this subsection shall be shared with Department of Transportation at a predetermined percentage or rate, and shall be earmarked by the Department to maintain the State owned rest areas from which the revenues are generated. The Department of Transportation may issue guidelines, rules, and policies necessary to administer this subsection.

History.

1971, c. 972, s. 1; 1973, c. 507, ss. 5, 16; c. 1194, ss. 4, 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 16; 1979, c. 174; 1981, c. 200, ss. 1, 2; c. 859, s. 68; 1985, c. 122, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, s. 46; c. 1018, s. 2; 1987, c. 400; 1989, c. 78; c. 749, ss. 2, 3; 1995, c. 167, s. 1; 1997-196, s. 1; 1999-25, ss. 2, 3; 2001-424, ss. 27.9(a), 27.9(b); 2002-151, s. 1; 2006-68, s. 1; 2006-203, s. 75; 2007-439, ss. 3, 4; 2009-266, s. 1; 2009-475, s. 12; 2010-194, s. 19; 2011-145, s. 28.3; 2011-326, s. 15(t); 2013-340, s. 2.1; 2016-94, ss. 35.5(a), 35.6(a); 2018-5, s. 34.15.

Cross References.

As to Highway Fund and Highway Trust Fund Small Project Bidding, see

G.S. 136-28.10

.

As to provisions similiar to those in former subsection (j) pertaining to design-build construction of transportation projects, see

G.S. 136-28.11

.

§ 136-28.2.
Relocated transportation infrastructure; contracts let by others.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to permit power companies and governmental agencies, including agencies of the federal government, when it is necessary to relocate transportation infrastructure by reason of the construction of a dam, to let contracts for the construction of the relocated transportation infrastructure. The construction shall be in accordance with the Department of Transportation standards and specifications. The Department of Transportation is further authorized to reimburse the power company or governmental agency for betterments arising out of the construction of the relocated transportation infrastructure, provided the bidding and the award is in accordance with the Department of Transportation’s regulations and the Department of Transportation approves the award of the contract.

History.

1971, c. 972, s. 2; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 2009-266, s. 13.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-266, s. 13, effective August 1, 2009, substituted “transportation infrastructure” for “highways” in the section catchline; and substituted “transportation infrastructure” for “highway” in the first and last sentences, and substituted “transportation infrastructure” for “a public highway” in the first sentence.

§ 136-28.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1194, s. 6.

§ 136-28.4.
(Expires August 31, 2022) State policy concerning participation by disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses in transportation contracts.

It is the policy of this State, based on a compelling governmental interest, to encourage and promote participation by disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses in contracts let by the Department pursuant to this Chapter for the planning, design, preconstruction, construction, alteration, or maintenance of State transportation infrastructure and in the procurement of materials for these projects. All State agencies, institutions, and political subdivisions shall cooperate with the Department of Transportation and among themselves in all efforts to conduct outreach and to encourage and promote the use of disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses in these contracts.

At least every five years, the Department shall conduct a study on the availability and utilization of disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned business enterprises and examine relevant evidence of the effects of race-based or gender-based discrimination upon the utilization of such business enterprises in contracts for planning, design, preconstruction, construction, alteration, or maintenance of State transportation infrastructure and in the procurement of materials for these projects. Should the study show a strong basis in evidence of ongoing effects of past or present discrimination that prevents or limits disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses from participating in the above contracts at a level which would have existed absent such discrimination, such evidence shall constitute a basis for the State’s continued compelling governmental interest in remedying such race and gender discrimination in transportation contracting. Under such circumstances, the Department shall, in conformity with State and federal law, adopt by rule and contract provisions a specific program to remedy such discrimination. This specific program shall, to the extent reasonably practicable, address each barrier identified in such study that adversely affects contract participation by disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses.

(b1)

Based upon the findings of the Department’s 2014 study entitled “North Carolina Department of Transportation Disparity Study, 2014,” hereinafter referred to as “Study”, the program design shall, to the extent reasonably practicable, incorporate narrowly tailored remedies identified in the Study, and the Department shall implement a comprehensive antidiscrimination enforcement policy. As appropriate, the program design shall be modified by rules adopted by the Department that are consistent with findings made in the Study and in subsequent studies conducted in accordance with subsection (b) of this section. As part of this program, the Department shall review its budget and establish a combined aspirational goal every three years, not a mandatory goal, in the form of a percentage, for the overall participation in contracts by disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses. This aspirational goal for disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses shall be established consistent with federal methodology and shall not be applied rigidly on specific contracts or projects. Instead, the Department shall establish a contract-specific goal or project-specific goal for the participation of such firms in a manner consistent with availability of disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses, as appropriately defined by its most recent Study. Nothing in this section shall authorize the use of quotas. Any program implemented as a result of the Study conducted in accordance with this section shall be narrowly tailored to eliminate the effects of historical and continuing discrimination and its impacts on such disadvantaged minority-owned and women-owned businesses without any undue burden on other contractors. The Department shall give equal opportunity for contracts it lets without regard to race, religion, color, creed, national origin, sex, age, or handicapping condition, as defined in

G.S. 168A-3

, to all contractors and businesses otherwise qualified.

The following definitions apply in this section:

“Contract” includes, but is not limited to, contracts let under the procedures set forth in G.S. 136-28.1(a) and (b).

(1a)

“Disadvantaged Business” has the same meaning as “disadvantaged business enterprise” in 49 C.F.R. § 26.5 Subpart A or any subsequently promulgated replacement regulation.

“Minority”’ includes only those racial or ethnicity classifications identified by a study conducted in accordance with this section that have been subjected to discrimination in the relevant marketplace and that have been adversely affected in their ability to obtain contracts with the Department.

“Women” means nonminority persons born of the female sex.

The Department shall report annually to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the utilization of disadvantaged minority-owned businesses and women-owned businesses and any program adopted to promote contracting opportunities for those businesses. Following each study of availability and utilization, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the results of the study for the purpose of determining whether the provisions of this section should continue in force and effect.

This section expires August 31, 2022.

History.

1983, c. 692, s. 3; 1989, c. 692, s. 1.5; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 143(a); 2006-261, s. 4; 2009-266, s. 3; 2010-165, s. 9; 2013-340, s. 2.2; 2014-108, s. 7(a); 2015-231, s. 3; 2017-57, s. 34.15(a).

§ 136-28.5.
Construction diaries; bid analysis and management system.

Diaries kept in connection with construction or repair contracts entered into pursuant to

G.S. 136-28.1

shall not be considered public records for the purposes of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes until the final estimate has been paid.

Analyses generated by the Department of Transportation’s Bid Analysis and Management System, including work papers, documents and the output of automated systems associated with the analyses of bids made by the Bid Analysis and Management System, are confidential and are not subject to the public records provisions of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 132-1

, bids and documents submitted in response to an advertisement or request for proposal under this Chapter shall not be public record until the Department issues a decision to award or not to award the contract.

History.

1987, c. 380, s. 1; 1991, c. 716, s. 1; 2012-78, s. 11.

§ 136-28.6.
Participation by the Department of Transportation with private developers.

The Department of Transportation may participate in private engineering and construction contracts for State transportation systems.

In order to qualify for State participation, the project must be:

The construction of a transportation project on the Transportation Improvement Plan adopted by the Department of Transportation; or

The construction of a transportation project on a mutually adopted transportation plan that is designated a Department of Transportation responsibility.

Only those projects in which the right-of-way is furnished without cost to the Department of Transportation are eligible.

The Department’s participation shall be limited to fifty percent (50%) of the amount of any engineering contract and/or any construction contract let for the project.

Department of Transportation participation in the contracts shall be limited to cost associated with normal practices of the Department of Transportation.

Plans for the project must meet Department of Transportation standards and shall be approved by the Department of Transportation.

Projects shall be constructed in accordance with the plans and specifications approved by the Department of Transportation.

The Secretary shall report in writing, on an annual basis, to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on all agreements entered into between a private developer and the Department of Transportation for participation in private engineering and construction contracts under this section, as well as (i) agreements by counties and municipalities to participate in private engineering and construction contracts under subsection (i) of this section and (ii) pass-through funding from private developers to counties or municipalities for State transportation projects. The information in the report required by this subsection shall be set forth separately for each division of the Department of Transportation.

Counties and municipalities may participate financially in private engineering, land acquisition, and construction contracts for transportation projects which meet the requirements of subsection (b) of this section within their jurisdiction.

The Department is authorized to create a statewide pilot program for participation in cost-sharing for transportation improvements in connection with driveway permits. The Department may create a fair share allocation formula and other procedures to facilitate the pilot program. The formula shall uniformly determine the value of transportation improvements and apportion these costs, on a project-by-project basis, among applicable parties, including the Department and private property developers. Transportation improvement projects developed under the pilot program may include the provision of ingress and egress to new private development prior to acceptance of the improved portion of the roads constructed providing access to the development by the State or local government for maintenance as a public street or highway. Nothing in this section shall require a private developer to participate in the pilot program to obtain a driveway permit or other approval from the Department or any local government.

Nothing in this section shall obligate the Department to custodial responsibility for managing or distributing monies in the application of this program.

The Department shall report on the pilot program to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Commission no later than the convening date of the 2021 Regular Session of the General Assembly.

History.

1987, c. 860, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 749, s. 1; 1991, c. 272, s. 1; 1993, c. 183, s. 1; 1995, c. 358, s. 5; c. 437, s. 3; c. 447, ss. 1, 2; 2002-170, s. 1; 2008-164, s. 2; 2009-266, s. 14; 2013-245, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 34.2; 2015-241, s. 29.12(e).

§ 136-28.6A.
Partnerships with private developers.

When in the best interest of the State, the Department may enter into a contract with a private developer to accomplish the engineering, design, or construction of improvements to the State highway system.

The Department is authorized to establish policies and promulgate rules providing for its participation in contracts for projects performed on or abutting a state highway or on a facility planned to be added to the State highway system for purposes of completing incidental work on the State highway system.

Any project funded or constructed under this section shall be subject to the following restrictions:

The Department’s participation shall be limited to the lesser of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the engineering contract and any construction contract let by the developer for the project or two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). However, under no circumstances shall participation in the contracts by the Department exceed costs associated with normal practices of the Department.

Plans for the project must meet established standards and shall be approved by the Department.

Projects shall be constructed in accordance with the plans and specifications approved by the Department.

The Secretary shall report annually, not later than March 1, in writing to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on all agreements entered into between the Department and a private developer for participation in private engineering and construction contracts under this section.

History.

2009-235, ss. 1, 2; 2014-58, s. 7; 2016-90, s. 2.3; 2019-199, s. 1.

§ 136-28.6B.
Applicable stormwater regulation.

For the purposes of stormwater regulation, any construction undertaken by a private party pursuant to the provisions of G.S. 136-18(17), 136-18(27), 136-18(29), 136-18(29a), 136-28.6, or 136-28.6A shall be considered to have been undertaken by the Department, and the stormwater law and rules applicable to the Department shall apply.

History.

2017-10, s. 2.11.

§ 136-28.7.
Contract requirements relating to construction materials.

The Department of Transportation shall require that every contract for construction or repair necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter shall contain a provision requiring that all steel and iron permanently incorporated into the construction or repair project be produced in the United States.

Subsection (a) shall not apply whenever the Department of Transportation determines in writing that this provision required by subsection (a) cannot be complied with because such products are not produced in the United States in sufficient quantities to meet the requirements of such contracts or cannot be complied with because the cost of such products produced in the United States unreasonably exceeds other such products.

The Department of Transportation shall apply this section consistent with the requirements in 23 C.F.R. § 635.410(b)(4).

The Department of Transportation shall not authorize, provide for, or make payments to any person pursuant to any contract containing the provision required by subsection (a) unless such person has fully complied with such provision.

History.

1989, c. 692, s. 1.18; c. 770, ss. 74.12, 74.14, 74.15; 2002-151, s. 3.

§ 136-28.8.
Use of recycled materials in construction.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of Transportation continue to expand its use of recycled materials in its construction and maintenance programs.

The General Assembly declares it to be in the public interest to find alternative ways to use certain recycled materials that currently are part of the solid waste stream and that contribute to problems of declining space in landfills. The Department shall, consistent with economic feasibility and applicable engineering and environmental quality standards, use:

Rubber from tires in road pavements, subbase materials, or other appropriate applications.

Recycled materials for guard rail posts, right-of-way fence posts, and sign supports.

Recycling technology, including, but not limited to, hot in-place recycling, in road and highway maintenance.

Recycled asphalt, provided that minimum content standards are met and the material meets minimum specifications for the project.

As a part of its scheduled projects, the Department shall conduct additional research, which may include demonstration projects, on the use of recycled materials in construction and maintenance.

The Department shall review and revise existing bid procedures and specifications to eliminate any procedures and specifications that explicitly discriminate against recycled materials in construction and maintenance, except where the procedures and specifications are necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this State.

The Department shall review and revise its bid procedures and specifications on a continuing basis to encourage the use of recycled materials in construction and maintenance and shall, to the extent economically practicable, require the use of recycled materials.

All agencies shall cooperate with the Department in carrying out the provisions of this section.

On or before October 1 of each year, the Department shall report to the Division of Environmental Assistance and Outreach of the Department of Environmental Quality as to the amounts and types of recycled materials that were specified or used in contracts that were entered into during the previous fiscal year. On or before January 15 of each year, the Division of Environmental Assistance and Outreach shall prepare a summary of this report and submit the summary to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division. The summary of this report shall also be included in the report required by G.S. 130A-309.06(c).

The Department, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Quality, shall determine minimum content standards for recycled materials.

This section is broadly applicable to all procurements by the Department if the quality of the product is consistent with the requirements of the bid specifications.

The Department may adopt rules to implement this section.

History.

1989, c. 784, s. 6; 1993, c. 256, s. 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 743, s. 9; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1999-237, s. 27.4; 2001-452, s. 3.6; 2010-31, s. 13.1(e); 2012-8, s. 1; 2012-200, s. 25; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2017-57, s. 14.1(e).

§ 136-28.9.
Retainage — construction contracts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.1

, 147-77, 147-80, 147-86.10, and 147-86.11, or any other provision of the law, the Department of Transportation is authorized to enter into trust agreements with banks and contractors for the deposit of retainage and for the payment to contractors of income on these deposits, in connection with transportation construction contracts, in trust accounts with banks in accordance with Department of Transportation regulations, including deposit insurance and collateral requirements. The Department of Transportation may contract with those banks without trust departments in addition to those with trust departments. Funds deposited in any trust account shall be invested only in bonds, securities, certificates of deposits, or other forms of investment authorized by

G.S. 147-69.1

for the investment of State funds. The trust agreement may also provide for interest to be paid on uninvested cash balances.

History.

1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1074, s. 38; 2009-266, s. 15.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-266, s. 15, effective August 1, 2009, substituted “transportation construction contracts” for “highway construction contracts” in the first sentence.

§ 136-28.10.
Highway Fund and Highway Trust Fund Small Project Bidding.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 136-28.4(b), for Highway Fund or Highway Trust Fund construction and repair projects of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or less, and maintenance projects of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or less per year, the Board of Transportation may, after soliciting and receiving at least three informal bids in writing from Small Business Enterprises, award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder. The Department of Transportation may identify projects likely to attract increased participation by Small Business Enterprises, and restrict the solicitation and award to those bidders. The Board of Transportation may delegate full authority to award contracts, adopt necessary rules, and administer the provisions of this section to the Secretary of Transportation.

The letting of contracts under this section is not subject to any of the provisions of

G.S. 136-28.1

relating to the letting of contracts. The Department may waive the bonding requirements of Chapter 44A of the General Statutes and the licensing requirements of Chapter 87 for contracts awarded under this section.

The Secretary of Transportation shall report annually to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the implementation of this section. The information in the report required by this subsection shall be set forth separately for each division of the Department of Transportation.

History.

1993, c. 561, s. 65; 1999-25, s. 1; 2009-266, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 29.12(g); 2021-185, s. 4(a).

Cross References.

As to letting of contracts to bidders after advertisement and exceptions, see

G.S. 136-28.1

.

As to State policy concerning participation by disadvantaged businesses in highway contracts, see

G.S. 136-28.4

.

§ 136-28.11.
Design-build construction of transportation projects.

Design-Build Contracts Authorized. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Transportation may award contracts each fiscal year for construction of transportation projects on a design-build basis.

Design-Build Contract Amounts; Basis of Award. — The Department may award contracts for the construction of transportation projects on a design-build basis of any amount. The Department shall endeavor to ensure design-build projects are awarded on a basis to maximize participation, competition, and cost benefit. On any project for which the Department proposes to use the design-build contracting method, the Department shall attempt to structure and size the contracts for the project in order that contracting firms and engineering firms based in North Carolina have a fair and equal opportunity to compete for the contracts.

Disadvantaged Business Participation Goals. — The provisions of

G.S. 136-28.4

and 49 C.F.R. Part 26 shall apply to the award of contracts under this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 34.2(c), effective July 1, 2013.

Reporting Requirements. — The Department, for any proposed design-build project projected to have a construction cost in excess of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), shall present to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee information on the scope and nature of the project and the reasons the development of the project on a design-build basis will best serve the public interest.

History.

2001-424, s. 27.2(a); 2002-151, s. 2; 2007-357, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 28.4; 2013-360, s. 34.2(c).

§ 136-28.12.
Litter removal coordinated with mowing of highway rights-of-way.

For State-maintained roads, the Department of Transportation shall coordinate litter removal and mowing as follows:

If the highway right-of-way to be mowed is part of the primary road system, the Department shall schedule the removal of litter before the right-of-way is mowed.

If the highway right-of-way to be mowed is part of the secondary road system, the Department shall schedule, to the extent practicable, the removal of litter before the right-of-way is mowed.

The Department shall require as a term of any contract to mow or remove litter that the contracting party agree to the provisions in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

2001-512, s. 3; 2021-185, s. 6(a).